West Virginia, session 2025, SB357.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of Transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64-8-1. Division of Motor Vehicles. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17A-2-9 of this code, modified by the Division of Motor Vehicles to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 2, 2024, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (denial, suspension, revocation, disqualification, restriction, non-renewal, cancellation, administrative appeals and reinstatement of driving privileges, 91 CSR 05), is authorized.